South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1119.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 157 Blackout Special License Plates Section 56-3-16610.  (A) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall issue blackout special license plates to owners of private passenger motor vehicles or motorcycles registered in their names. This special license plate is exempt from the provisions contained in Section 56-3-8100. Each blackout special license plate must have a solid black background and white characters imprinted horizontally. (B) Each special license plate must be issued or revalidated for a biennial period that expires twenty-four months from the month the plate is issued. The fee for each special license plate is the regular biennial registration fee contained in Article 5, Chapter 3 of this title plus an additional biennial fee of forty dollars. The additional biennial fee of forty dollars must be credited to the State Highway Fund. The fee for each special personalized plate is an additional biennial fee of sixty dollars, which must be credited to the State Highway Fund. SECTION 2.  The department shall produce special blackout plates within six months after the effective date of this act. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----